Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.915

Waiver of operating fees—Report.

In addition to waivers granted under the authority of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical colleges, subject to state board policy, may waive all or a portion of the operating fees for any student. There shall be no state general fund support for waivers granted under this section.

By January 31st of each odd-numbered year, the institutions of higher education shall prepare a report of the costs and benefits of waivers granted under chapter 152, Laws of 2000 and shall transmit copies of their report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature.

[ 2015 c 55 s 225; 2000 c 152 s 1.]